trunk/apertium-es-pt/apertium-es-pt.es.dix
          <l>oviese</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovierais</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ovieseis</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovieras</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ovieses</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovieran</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oviesen</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oviera</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oviese</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovidas</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovida</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovidos</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovido</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovemos</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uevo</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovéis</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueves</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueven</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueve</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovamos</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueva</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ováis</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uevas</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uevan</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ueva</l>
          <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ll/over__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>overía</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>overá</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oviere</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oviendo</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oviéndo</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovieron</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovió</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>over</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>over</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>over</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovía</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oviera</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>oviese</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovidas</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovida</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovidos</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovido</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ueve</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ueva</l>
        <r>over<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

      <e lm="llover">
        <i>ll</i>
        <par n="ll/over__vblex"/>
      </e>
